Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-933
Act, how cited.

Sections 84-933 to 84-948 shall be known and may be cited as the Occupational Board Reform Act.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 1.
July 1, 2019